Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-451
Anhydrous ammonia; possession; penalty.

No person shall possess anhydrous ammonia with the intent to manufacture methamphetamine. Any person who violates this section is guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 2001, LB 113, § 4.